sk-SK: Určený typ dosky: Stabilizátor hydrofoilu; Race/Weed; Smerové surfovanie; Twin tip; Iné
pt-BR: Prancha tipo pretendido: Estabilizador de hydrofoil; Race/Weed; Direcional de surf; Twin tip; Outro
lt-LT: Numatytas lentos tipas: „Hydrofoil“ stabilizatorius; Lenktynėms / žolėtiems telkiniams; Kryptinė banglentė; Simetrinė (Twin tip); Kita
tr: Kullanım amacı tahta türü: Hidrofoil dengeleyici; Yarış/Yosun; Sörf (yönlü); Twin tip; Diğer
ro-RO: Tipul de placă dorit: Stabilizator hydrofoil; Cursă/alge; Surf direcțional; Twin tip; Altele
es: Tipo de placa previsto: Estabilizador de hydrofoil; Carrera/algas; Surf direccional; Punta doble; Otro
ru: Предназначенный тип доски: Стабилизатор гидрофойла; Гоночный / антиводорослевый; Направленный серф; Твинтип; Другое
sl-SI: Predvidena vrsta deske: Stabilizator za hydrofoil; Tekmovalna/Weed; Smerna surf (directional); Dvosmerna (twin tip); Drugo
vi: Loại ván dự định: Cánh thăng bằng hydrofoil; Ván đua/chống vướng rong; Ván lướt sóng một chiều; Ván hai đầu; Khác
zh-TW: 適用板型: 水翼穩定器; 競速/防草; 定向衝浪; 雙向板; 其他
ko: 의도된 보드 유형: 하이드로포일 스태빌라이저; 레이스/위드; 서프 디렉셔널; 트윈 팁; 기타
pl: Przeznaczony typ płyty: Stabilizator foil; Race / na trawy (weed); Surf directional; Twin tip; Inny
el: Προβλεπόμενος τύπος σανίδας: Σταθεροποιητής hydrofoil; Race/Weed; Κατευθυντική σανίδα σερφ; Twin tip; Άλλο
th: ประเภทบอร์ดที่ต้องการใช้งาน: สเตบิไลเซอร์สำหรับไฮโดรฟอยล์; เรซ/ลุยวัชพืช; เซิร์ฟแบบทิศทางเดียว; ทวินทิป; อื่นๆ
da: Beregnet boardtype: Hydrofoil-stabilisator; Race/græs; Surf directional; Twintip; Andet
pt-PT: Tipo de placa pretendido: Estabilizador de hydrofoil; Competição/algas; Surf direcional; Twin tip; Outro
bg-BG: Предвиден тип дъска: Хидрофойл стабилизатор; Race/Weed; Сърф (насочен); Twin tip; Други
zh-CN: 适配板型: 水翼稳定器; 竞速/防草; 定向冲浪板; 双向冲浪板; 其他
en: Intended board type: Hydrofoil stabilizer; Race/Weed; Surf directional; Twin tip; Other
it: Tipo di tavola previsto: Stabilizzatore per hydrofoil; Gara/Antialga; Tavola da surf direzionale; Twin tip; Altro
hr-HR: Namijenjena vrsta ploče: Stabilizator za hydrofoil; Utrke/alge; Surf (directional); Twin tip; Ostalo
hu: Tervezett deszkatípus: Szárnyashajó-stabilizátor; Verseny/hínáros; Irányított szörf; Twin tip; Egyéb
ja: 想定されるボードタイプ: ハイドロフォイルスタビライザー; レース/ウィード; サーフディレクショナル; ツインチップ; その他
nb: Tiltenkt brettype: Hydrofoil-stabilisator; Race/weed; Surf (retningsbestemt); Twin-tip; Annet
fr: Type de planche prévu: Stabilisateur d’hydrofoil; Course/anti-algues; Surf directionnel; Twin tip; Autre
fi: Suunniteltu lautatyyppi: Kantosiiven vakaaja; Kilpa/ruoho; Suunnattu surffilauta; Twin-tip; Muu
de: Vorgesehener Boardtyp: Hydrofoil-Stabilisator; Race/Weed; Surf Directional; Twin Tip; Sonstige
nl: Beoogd board type: Hydrofoil-stabilisator; Race/wier; Surf directional; Twintip; Overig
sv: Avsedd korttyp: Hydrofoil-stabilisator; Race/sjögräs; Surf (direktionell); Twintip; Annat
cs: Zamýšlený typ desky: Stabilizátor pro hydrofoil; Race / do řas; Směrový surf; Twin tip; Jiné